Utah statutes.
11-42-204.   Hearing.

(1)  On the date and at the time and place specified in the notice under Section 11-42-202, the governing body shall hold a public hearing.

(2)  The governing body may continue the public hearing from time to time to a fixed future date and time.

(3)  At the public hearing, the governing body shall:

(a)  hear all objections to the designation of the proposed assessment area or the improvements proposed to be provided in the assessment area;

(b)  hear all persons desiring to be heard; and

(c)  consider all protests filed under Section 11-42-203.

(4)  The governing body may make changes in:

(a)  improvements proposed to be provided to the proposed assessment area; or

(b)  the area or areas proposed to be included within the proposed assessment area.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

